Tennessee statutes. Title 66 Property
Part 2

Devises

66-3-201. Devises declared void.

All devises of lands, tenements, and hereditaments, or of any rent, profit, term, or charge out of the same, contrived and made to defraud creditors of their just debts, shall be deemed and taken to be null and void only as against such creditors, their heirs, successors, executors, administrators, and assigns, and every one of them.

Code 1858, § 1762 (deriv. Acts 1789, ch. 39, § 2); Shan., § 3153; Code 1932, § 7835; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-304.

Cross-References. Statute of frauds, §29-2-101.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 854.

66-3-202. Action against devisees.

Every such creditor may maintain an action or suit against such devisee, and, severally or jointly, against the debtor and the heirs at law of the debtor, in all cases, and in like manner, as such action or suit could be brought or maintained against the debtor's heirs at law.

Code 1858, § 1763 (deriv. Acts 1789, ch. 39, § 2); Shan., § 3154; Code 1932, § 7836; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-305.

Cross-References. Creditor's bill to set aside conveyance, §29-12-101.

Statute of frauds, §29-2-101.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 854.

66-3-203. Execution for value of alienated lands.

If the devisee sells, aliens, or makes over the lands so devised, before an action is brought or process sued out against the devisee, such devisee shall be answerable for such debt to the value of the lands, sold, aliened, or made over; and execution shall be taken out upon the judgment or decree obtained against such devisee to the value of the lands, as if the same were the devisee's own proper debt.

Code 1858, § 1764 (deriv. Acts 1789, ch. 39, § 3); Shan., § 3155; Code 1932, § 7837; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-306.

Cross-References. Attachment and replevy, title 29, ch. 6.

Execution, title 26, ch. 1.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 854.

66-3-204. Bona fide purchasers protected.

Lands, tenements, and hereditaments, bona fide aliened before the action brought, shall not be liable to such execution.

Code 1858, § 1765 (deriv. Acts 1789, ch. 39, § 3); Shan., § 3156; Code 1932, § 7838; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-307.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 854.